el: Συστατικά τροφής πτηνών: Καλαμπόκι; Φρούτα; Κεχρί; Σογιάλευρο; Ηλιόσποροι; Σκουλήκια; Άλλο
fr: Ingrédients de la nourriture pour oiseaux: Maïs; Fruits; Millet; Tourteau de soja; Graines de tournesol; Vers; Autre
vi: Nguyên liệu thức ăn cho chim: Ngô; Trái cây; Hạt kê; Bã đậu nành; Hạt hướng dương; Giun; Khác
nl: Ingrediënten vogelvoer: Mais; Fruit; Gierst; Sojameel; Zonnebloempitten; Wormen; Andere
pl: Składniki żywności dla ptaków: Kukurydza; Owoce; Proso; Mączka sojowa; Ziarna słonecznika; Robaki; Inne
ru: Ингредиенты в составе корма для птиц: Кукуруза; Фрукты; Пшено; Соевый шрот; Семена подсолнечника; Черви; Другое
ja: 鳥の食べ物の材料: コーン; フルーツ; 雑穀; 大豆粕; ひまわりの種; ワーム; その他
da: Fuglefoderingredienser: Majs; Frugter; Hirse; Sojabønnemel; Solsikkefrø; Orme; Andet
cs: Složky krmiva pro ptáky: Kukuřice; Ovoce; Proso; Sojová mouka; Slunečnicová semínka; Červi; Jiné
hu: Madáreledel összetevői: Gabonafélék; Gyümölcsök; Köles; Szójaliszt; Napraforgómag; Férgek; Egyéb
lt-LT: Paukščių lesalo sudėtis: Kukurūzai; Vaisiai; Soros; Sojų lesalas; Saulėgrąžų sėklos; Sliekai; Kita
pt-BR: Ingredientes de alimentos para pássaros: Milho; Frutas; Milhete; Farinha de soja; Semente de girassol; Minhocas; Outro
pt-PT: Ingredientes de comida para pássaros: Milho; Frutas; Milhete; Farinha de soja; Sementes de girassol; Minhocas; Outro
sl-SI: Sestavine hrane za ptice: Koruza; Sadje; Proso; Sojina moka; Sončnična semena; Črvi; Drugo
en: Bird food ingredients: Corn; Fruits; Millet; Soybean meal; Sunflower seeds; Worms; Other
fi: Lintujen ruoan ainesosat: Maissi; Hedelmät; Hirssi; Soijajauho; Auringonkukansiemenet; Madot; Muu
tr: Kuş yemi içerikleri: Mısır; Meyveler; Darı; Soya küspesi; Ayçekirdeği; Solucanlar; Diğer
de: Zutaten für Vogelfutter: Mais; Früchte; Hirse; Sojaschrot; Sonnenblumenkerne; Würmer; Sonstiges
nb: Ingredienser for fuglemat: Mais; Frukt; Hirse; Soyabønnemåltid; Solsikkefrø; Ormer; Annet
hr-HR: Sastojci hrane za ptice: Kukuruz; Voće; Proso; Sojina kaša; Suncokretove sjemenke; Crvi; Ostalo
sk-SK: Prísady krmiva pre vtáky: Kukurica; Ovocie; Proso; Sójová múčka; Slnečnicové semienka; Červy; Iné
th: ส่วนผสมอาหารนก: ข้าวโพด; ผลไม้ต่างๆ; ข้าวฟ่าง; กากถั่วเหลือง; เมล็ดทานตะวัน; หนอน; อื่นๆ
it: Ingredienti per il cibo degli uccelli: Mais; Frutta; Miglio; Farina di soia; Semi di girasole; Vermi; Altro
sv: Ingredienser fågelmat: Majs; Frukter; Hirs; Sojamjöl; Solroskärnor; Maskar; Övrigt
es: Ingredientes de la comida para pájaros: Maíz; Frutas; Mijo; Harina de soja; Semillas de girasol; Gusanos; Otros
zh-CN: 鸟食成分: 玉米; 水果; 小米; 豆粕; 葵花籽; 蠕虫; 其他
ro-RO: Ingrediente mâncare păsări: Porumb; Fructe; Mei; Făină de soia; Semințe de floarea-soarelui; Viermi; Altele
ko: 새 모이 성분: 옥수수; 과일; 수수; 대두박; 해바라기씨; 벌레; 기타
zh-TW: 鳥類飼料原料: 玉米; 水果; 小米; 豆粕; 葵花籽; 蟲; 其他
bg-BG: Съставки на храните за птици: Царевица; Плодове; Просо; Соев шрот; Слънчогледови семена; Червеи; Други